Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-737
Issuance of permit; no right to violate rules, regulations, or controls.

The issuance by the district of a permit pursuant to section 46-736 or registration of a water well by the department pursuant to section 46-602 shall not vest in any person the right to violate any district rule, regulation, or control in effect on the date of issuance of the permit or the registration of the water well or to violate any rule, regulation, or control properly adopted after such date.

Laws 1975, LB 577, § 6;

Laws 1983, LB 23, § 5;

Laws 1984, LB 1071, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-661;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 37;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 199;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 46-656.31;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 77;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 233.